Washington statutes.
RCW 42.56.410

Employment security department records, certain purposes.

The following information related to employment security is exempt from disclosure under this chapter:

(1) Records maintained by the employment security department and subject to chapter 50.13 or 50A.25 RCW if provided to another individual or organization for operational, research, or evaluation purposes are exempt from disclosure under this chapter; and

(2) Any inventory or data map records created under RCW 50.13.120(1)(b) that reveal the location of personal information or the extent to which it is protected.

[ 2019 c 81 s 10; 2019 c 13 s 68; 2005 c 274 s 421.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2019 c 13 s 68 and by 2019 c 81 s 10, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).